North Dakota statutes. TITLE 53 Sports and Amusements
CHAPTER 53-06.1 Games of Chance
53-06.1-11.
Gross proceeds — Allowable expenses — Rent limits.

All money received from games must be accounted for according to the gaming rules. Gaming activity for a quarter must be reported on a tax return form prescribed by the attorney general. Unless otherwise authorized by the attorney general, the purchase price of a merchandise prize must be paid from a gaming bank account by check. A cash prize paid by check must be paid from a gaming bank account. No check drawn from a gaming or trust bank account may be payable to “cash” or a fictitious payee. A cash prize that exceeds an amount set by rule must be accounted for by a receipt prescribed by the gaming rules.

Allowable expenses may be deducted from adjusted gross proceeds. The allowable expense limit is sixty percent of the adjusted gross proceeds per quarter.

Cash shorts incurred in games and interest and penalty are classified as expenses.

For a site where bingo is conducted:

If bingo is the primary game, the monthly rent must be reasonable.

If bingo is not the primary game, but is conducted with twenty-one, paddlewheels, or pull tabs, no additional rent is allowed.

For a site where bingo is not the primary game:

If twenty-one or paddlewheels is conducted, the monthly rent may not exceed two hundred dollars multiplied by the necessary number of tables based on criteria prescribed by gaming rule. For each twenty-one table with a wager greater than five dollars, an additional amount up to one hundred dollars may be added to the monthly rent. If pull tabs is also conducted involving only a jar bar, the monthly rent for pull tabs may not exceed an additional one hundred seventy-five dollars. If pull tabs is conducted involving only a dispensing device or a jar bar and dispensing device, the monthly rent for pull tabs may not exceed an additional three hundred twenty-five dollars.

If twenty-one and paddlewheels are not conducted but pull tabs is conducted involving either a jar bar or dispensing device, the monthly rent may not exceed four hundred dollars.

If pull tabs is conducted using one or more electronic pull tab devices, the monthly rent may not exceed an additional one hundred dollars per machine for the first five machines in the same venue. For each additional machine in the same venue beyond five, the monthly rent may not exceed an additional fifty dollars per machine up to a maximum of one thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars per month for all electronic pull tab devices in a single venue.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 11; 1983, ch. 546, § 13; 1985, ch. 554, § 1; 1987, ch. 616, § 1; 1989, ch. 170, § 3; 1989, ch. 615, § 6; 1991, ch. 546, § 2; 1993, ch. 499, § 21; 1995, ch. 484, § 19; 1995, ch. 485, § 3; 1995, ch. 486, § 1; 1997, ch. 428, § 14; 1999, ch. 441, § 9; 2001, ch. 462, § 2; 2001, ch. 463, § 1; 2011, ch. 378, § 2; 2013, ch. 396, § 1; 2015, ch. 359, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 359, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 360, § 7, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 428, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 359, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 396, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 378, S.L. 2011 became effective July 1, 2011.

53-06.1-11.1.
Restricted use of money in certain political activities — Eligible uses of net proceeds.

Except as provided in subdivision c of subsection 1 of section 53-06.1-03:

A licensed organization or an organization that has a permit may not use money from any source for placing an initiated or referred measure on a ballot or for a political campaign to promote or oppose a person for public office.

Except for a use related to an organization’s primary purpose, a licensed organization or organization that has a permit may not use net proceeds to influence legislation or promote or oppose referendums or initiatives.

Any funds expended by a licensed organization or an organization that has a permit to promote or oppose an initiated or referred measure that is on the ballot or for any activities of a lobbyist under section 54-05.1-02, that are not compensation or expenses paid to a lobbyist, and that are not required to be reported under section 54-05.1-03 must be reported to the attorney general as prescribed by the attorney general. A violation of this subsection subjects an organization to a suspension of its license or permit for up to one year.

A licensed organization or an organization that has a restricted event permit shall disburse net proceeds within the period prescribed by rule and for only these educational, charitable, patriotic, fraternal, religious, or public-spirited uses:

Uses for stimulating and promoting state and community-based economic development programs within the state which improve the quality of life of community residents.

Uses for developing, promoting, and supporting tourism within a city, county, or the state.

Uses benefiting an indefinite number of persons by bringing them under the influence of education, cultural programs, or religion which include disbursements to provide:

Scholarships for students, if the disbursement is deposited in a scholarship fund for defraying the cost of education to students and the scholarships are awarded through an open and fair selection process.

Supplementary assistance to a public or private nonprofit educational institution registered with or accredited by any state.

Assistance to libraries and museums.

Assistance for the performing arts and humanities.

Preservation of cultural heritage.

Youth community, social welfare, and athletic activities.

Adult amateur athletic activities within the state, including team uniforms and equipment.

Maintenance of places of public worship or support of a body of communicants, gathered in common membership for mutual support and edification in piety, worship, or religious observances.

Scientific research.

Uses benefiting an indefinite number of persons by relieving them of disease, suffering, or constraint which include disbursements to provide:

Assistance to an individual or family suffering from poverty or homelessness.

Encouragement and enhancement of the active participation of the elderly in our society.

Services to the abused.

Services to persons with an addicted behavior toward alcohol, gambling, or drugs.

Funds to combat juvenile delinquency and rehabilitate ex-offenders.

Relief for the sick, diseased, and terminally ill and their physical well-being.

Funds for emergency relief and volunteer services.

Funds to nonprofit nursing homes, nonprofit day care centers, and nonprofit medical facilities.

Social services and education programs aimed at aiding emotionally and physically distressed, handicapped, elderly, and underprivileged persons.

Funds for crime prevention, fire protection and prevention, and public safety.

Funds to relieve, improve, and advance the physical and mental conditions, care and medical treatment, and health and welfare of injured or disabled veterans.

Uses that perpetuate the memory and history of the dead.

Uses increasing comprehension of and devotion to the principles upon which the nation was founded, including disbursements to aid in teaching the principles of liberty, truth, justice, and equality. However, beauty pageants do not qualify.

The erection or maintenance of public buildings, facilities, utilities, or waterworks.

Uses lessening the burden of government which include disbursements to an entity that is normally funded by a city, county, state, or United States government and disbursements directly to a government entity or its agency.

Uses benefiting a definite number of persons who are the victims of loss of home or household possessions through explosion, fire, flood, or storm and the loss is not covered by insurance.

Uses benefiting a definite number of persons suffering from a seriously disabling disease or injury causing severe loss of income or incurring extraordinary medical expense which is not covered by insurance.

Uses, for community service projects, by chambers of commerce exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code. A project qualifies if it develops or promotes public services, including education, housing, transportation, recreation, crime prevention, fire protection and prevention, safety, tourism, and health. Uses that directly benefit a chamber of commerce do not qualify.

Uses for or of benefit to efforts in support of the health, comfort, or well-being of the community which include disbursements to provide:

Funds for adult bands, including drum and bugle corps.

Funds for trade shows and conventions conducted in this state.

Funds for nonprofit organizations that operate a humane society, zoo, or fish or wildlife reproduction and habitat enhancement program.

Funds for public transportation, community celebration, and recreation.

Funds for preservation and cleanup of the environment.

To the extent net proceeds are used toward the primary purpose of a charitable, educational, religious, public safety, or public-spirited organization, or are used for a veterans or public cemetery by a veterans organization, that has obtained a final determination from the internal revenue service as qualifying for exemption from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code, the organization may establish a special trust fund or foundation as a contingency for funding or maintaining the organization’s future program services should the organization discontinue conducting games or dissolve.

Uses for a fundraising activity unrelated to an organization’s primary purpose provided that the gross revenue from the activity is disbursed to uses prescribed by this subsection.

The eligible uses in subsection 2 do not include the erection, acquisition, property taxes, special assessments, improvement, maintenance, or repair of real property owned or leased by an organization unless the real property is used exclusively for an eligible use or by a veterans organization.

A licensed organization or recipient of net proceeds may not use net proceeds for administrative or operating expenses involving the conduct of games.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 615, § 7; 1995, ch. 484, § 20; 1997, ch. 428, § 15; 1999, ch. 441, § 10; 2001, ch. 460, § 10; 2003, ch. 449, § 7; 2017, ch. 362, § 1, effective March 23, 2017; 2019, ch. 427, § 4, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 388, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 386, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 386, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 53-06.1-11.1 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 386, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2251; and Section 1 of Chapter 388, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1263.

53-06.1-11.2.
Charitable gaming operating fund — Attorney general — State treasurer — Continuing appropriation — Allocations — Transfer to the general fund.

There is created in the state treasury the charitable gaming operating fund. The fund consists of all gaming taxes, monetary fines, and interest and penalties collected under this chapter.

Excluding moneys in the charitable gaming operating fund appropriated by the legislative assembly for administrative and operating costs associated with charitable gaming, the attorney general shal allocate remaining moneys in the charitable gaming operating fund on a quarterly basis as follows:

Ten thousand dollars to the gambling disorder prevention and treatment fund.

Five percent of the total moneys deposited in the charitable gaming operating fund to cities and counties in proportion to the taxes collected under section 53-06.1-12 from licensed organizations conducting games within each city, for sites within city limits, or within each county, for sites outside city limits. If a city or county allocation is less than two hundred dollars, that city or county is not entitled to receive a payment for the quarter and the undistributed amount must be included in the total amount to be distributed to other cities and counties for the quarter.

On or before June thirtieth of each odd-numbered year, the attorney general shall certify to the state treasurer the amount of accumulated funds in the charitable gaming operating fund which exceed the amount appropriated by the legislative assembly for administrative and operating costs associated with charitable gaming for the subsequent biennium. The state treasurer shall transfer the certified amount from the charitable gaming operating fund to the general fund prior to the end of each biennium.

Source:

S.L. 2021, hb1212, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 53-06.1-11.2 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 15 of Chapter 3, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1003; and Section 1 of Chapter 389, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1212.

53-06.1-12.
Gaming tax — Deposits. [Retroactive application — See note]

Except as provided in subsection 2, a gaming tax is imposed on the total adjusted gross proceeds received by a licensed organization in a quarter and the tax must be computed and paid to the attorney general on a quarterly basis on the tax return. This tax must be paid from adjusted gross proceeds and is not part of the allowable expenses. For a licensed organization with adjusted gross proceeds:

Not exceeding fifty thousand dollars the tax is one percent of adjusted gross proceeds.

Exceeding fifty thousand dollars the tax is five hundred dollars plus twelve percent of adjusted gross proceeds exceeding fifty thousand dollars.

For a licensed organization permitted to conduct raffles in this state with adjusted gross proceeds exceeding fifty thousand dollars, a gaming tax of one percent of gross proceeds is imposed on the total gross proceeds received by the licensed organization from raffles in a quarter. The tax must be computed and paid to the attorney general on a quarterly basis on the tax return. The tax must be paid from adjusted gross proceeds and is not part of the allowable expenses.

The tax must be paid to the attorney general at the time tax returns are filed.

The attorney general shall deposit gaming taxes, monetary fines, and interest and penalties collected in the charitable gaming operating fund.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 12; 1983, ch. 546, § 14; 1989, ch. 170, § 4; 1991, ch. 28, § 24; 1993, ch. 499, § 22; 1995, ch. 484, § 21; 1997, ch. 428, § 16; 2001, ch. 3, § 15; 2001, ch. 464, § 1; 2003, ch. 449, § 8; 2007, ch. 446, § 2; 2009, ch. 450, § 2; 2009, ch. 453, § 1; 2009, ch. 454, § 1; 2011, ch. 378, § 3; 2013, ch. 397, § 1; 2021, ch. 389, § 2, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 562, § 1, effective November 12, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 397, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 378, S.L. 2011 became effective July 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 450, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 453, S.L. 2009 is effective for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2009.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 454, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 446, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 562, S.L. 2021, 1st Sp. Sess., provides, “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION.

This Act applies retroactively to raffles conducted after June 30, 2021.”

Collateral References.

Validity of state or local gross receipts tax on gambling,
21 A.L.R.5th 812.

53-06.1-12.1.
Deposits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-12.2.
Pull tab excise tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-12.3.
Interest, penalty, and estimated tax.

Assessment of interest. If a licensed organization does not pay tax due by the original date of a tax return, or if additional tax is due based on an audit or math verification of the return and it is not paid by the original due date of the return, the organization shall pay interest on the tax at the rate of twelve percent per annum computed from the original due date of the return through the date the tax is paid.

Assessment of penalty. If a licensed organization does not pay tax due on a tax return by the original or extended due date of the return, or if additional tax is due based on an audit or math verification of the return and it is not paid by the original or extended due date of the return, the organization shall pay a penalty of five percent of the tax, or twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater. If an organization does not file a tax return by the original or extended due date of the return, the organization shall pay a penalty of five percent of the tax, or twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater, for each month or fraction of a month during which the return is not filed, not exceeding a total of twenty-five percent.

The attorney general may require a licensed organization to make monthly estimated gaming tax payments if the attorney general determines that the organization is in poor financial condition. If an organization fails to pay any tax or estimated tax, interest, or penalty by the original due date or date set by the attorney general, the attorney general may bring court action to collect it and may suspend the organization’s license. The attorney general may for good cause waive all or part of any interest or penalty and may waive any minimal tax.

If a licensed organization has failed to file a tax return, has been notified by the attorney general of the delinquency, and refuses or neglects within thirty days after the notice to file a proper return, the attorney general shall determine the adjusted gross proceeds and gaming tax due according to the best information available and assess the tax at not more than double the amount. Interest and penalty also must be assessed.

The attorney general may authorize a licensed organization to pay any delinquent tax, interest, or penalty on an installment plan and may set any qualifying conditions.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 484, § 24; 1997, ch. 428, § 17; 1999, ch. 441, § 11; 2003, ch. 449, § 9; 2009, ch. 450, § 3; 2011, ch. 378, § 4.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 378, S.L. 2011 became effective July 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 450, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

53-06.1-13.
Examination of books and records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-13.1.
Financial statements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-14.
Distributors and manufacturers.

A manufacturer of pull tabs, bingo cards, electronic pull tab devices, or bingo card marking devices shall apply annually for a license and pay a license fee of four thousand dollars. A manufacturer of pull tab dispensing devices shall apply annually for a license and pay a license fee of one thousand dollars. A manufacturer of fifty-fifty raffle systems shall apply annually for a license and pay a license fee of five hundred dollars. A distributor shall apply annually for a license and pay a license fee of one thousand five hundred dollars. Application must be made before the first day of April in each year on a form prescribed by the attorney general.

A licensed distributor may not sell, market, or distribute gaming equipment except to a licensed distributor, licensed organization, organization that has a permit, or other person authorized by gaming rule or the attorney general. A manufacturer of a pull tab dispensing device, pull tab, electronic pull tab device, bingo card marking device, bingo card, or fifty-fifty raffle system may only sell, market, or distribute the manufacturer’s pull tab dispensing device and processing chip encoded with proprietary software, pull tab, electronic pull tab device, bingo card marking device, bingo card, or fifty-fifty raffle system to a licensed distributor. A licensed distributor may purchase or acquire a pull tab dispensing device and processing chip encoded with proprietary software, pull tab, electronic pull tab device, bingo card marking device, bingo card, or fifty-fifty raffle system only from a licensed manufacturer or licensed distributor. However, a distributor may purchase or acquire a used pull tab dispensing device or electronic pull tab device from a licensed organization. A distributor may not duplicate a manufacturer’s processing chip encoded with proprietary software. No gaming equipment or prize may be sold or leased at an excessive price.

A licensed distributor shall affix a North Dakota gaming stamp to each deal of pull tabs, raffle board, punchboard, sports pool board, calcutta board, and series of paddlewheel ticket cards sold or otherwise provided to a licensed organization and shall purchase the stamps from the attorney general for thirty-five cents each. Ten cents of each stamp sold by the attorney general, up to thirty-six thousand dollars per biennium, must be credited to the attorney general’s operating fund to defray the costs of issuing and administering the gaming stamps.

A licensed organization, organization that has a permit, licensed manufacturer, or North Dakota wholesaler of liquor or alcoholic beverages may not be a distributor or stockholder of a distributor. A distributor may not be a stockholder of a manufacturer.

In addition to the license fee, the attorney general may require advance payment of any fee necessary to pay the cost of a record check of an applicant according to subdivision c of subsection 5 of section 53-06.1-06.

A licensed manufacturer may not refuse to sell deals of pull tabs, paper bingo cards, or gaming equipment to a licensed distributor unless:

A specific deal of pull tabs is sold on an exclusive basis;

The manufacturer does not sell deals of pull tabs, paper bingo cards, or gaming equipment to any distributor in the state;

A gaming law or rule prohibits the sale;

The distributor has not provided the manufacturer with proof of satisfactory credit or is delinquent on any payment owed to the manufacturer; or

The distributor has not met the manufacturer’s standard minimum order quantity and freight terms.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 14; 1987, ch. 609, § 3; 1989, ch. 170, § 7; 1989, ch. 612, § 15; 1989, ch. 618, § 2; 1991, ch. 28, § 28; 1991, ch. 545, § 5; 1991, ch. 551, § 3; 1991, ch. 552, § 4; 1991, ch. 554, § 1; 1993, ch. 499, § 26; 1995, ch. 484, § 26; 1997, ch. 3, § 6; 1997, ch. 428, § 18; 1999, ch. 25, § 9; 1999, ch. 441, § 12; 2001, ch. 460, § 11; 2001, ch. 465, § 1; 2003, ch. 24, § 9; 2003, ch. 449, § 10; 2003, ch. 451, § 1; 2015, ch. 360, §
1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 359, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 360, § 8, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 427, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 360, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

53-06.1-15.
Form and display of license and local permit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-15.1.
Authority of the attorney general.

The attorney general may:

Inspect all sites in which gaming is conducted or inspect all premises where gaming equipment is manufactured or distributed. The attorney general may require a licensed manufacturer to reimburse the attorney general for the reasonable actual cost of transportation, lodging, meals, and incidental expenses incurred in inspecting the manufacturer’s facility.

Inspect all gaming equipment and supplies.

Seize, remove, or impound any gaming equipment, supplies, games, or books and records for the purpose of examination and inspection.

Demand access to and inspect, examine, photocopy, and audit all books and records of applicants, organizations, lessors, manufacturers, distributors, and affiliated companies concerning any income, expense, or use of net proceeds, and determine compliance with this chapter or gaming rules.

Permit the commissioner or proper representative of the internal revenue service of the United States to inspect a tax return or furnish a copy of the tax return, or information concerning any item contained in the return, or disclosed by any audit or investigation report of the gaming activity of any organization or player, or recordkeeping information. However, information cannot be disclosed to the extent that the attorney general determines that the disclosure would identify a confidential informant or seriously impair any civil or criminal investigation. Except when directed by judicial order, or for pursuing civil or criminal charges regarding a violation of this chapter or a gaming rule, or as is provided by law, the attorney general may not divulge nor make known, to any person, any income or expense item contained in any tax return or disclosed by an audit or investigative report of any taxpayer provided to the attorney general by the internal revenue service.

Require a representative of a licensed organization or distributor to participate in training or for good cause prohibit the person from being involved in gaming as an employee or volunteer. The attorney general may for good cause prohibit a person from providing personal or business services to an organization or distributor.

Prohibit a person from playing games if the person violates this chapter, chapter 12.1-28 or 53-06.2, or a gaming rule.

Require or authorize an organization to pay or prohibit an organization from paying a bingo, electronic quick shot bingo, or raffle prize to a player on a dispute or based on a factual determination or a hearing by the attorney general.

Based on reasonable ground or written complaint, suspend, deny, or revoke an organization’s permit or an organization’s, distributor’s, or manufacturer’s application or license for violation, by the organization, distributor, or manufacturer or any officer, director, agent, member, or employee of the organization, distributor, or manufacturer, of this chapter or any gaming rule.

Impose a monetary fine on a licensed organization, organization that has a permit, distributor, or manufacturer for failure to comply with this chapter or any gaming rule. The monetary fine for each violation by an organization is a minimum of twenty-five dollars and may not exceed two percent of the organization’s average quarterly gross proceeds, or five thousand dollars, whichever is greater. The monetary fine for each violation by a distributor is a minimum of one hundred dollars and may not exceed five thousand dollars. The monetary fine for each violation by a manufacturer is a minimum of five hundred dollars and may not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars. This fine may be in addition to or in place of a license suspension or revocation.

At any time within three years after any amount of fees, monetary fine, interest, penalty, or tax required to be paid pursuant to this chapter becomes due, bring a civil action to collect the amount due. However, if for any reason there is a change in adjusted gross proceeds or tax liability by an amount which is in excess of twenty-five percent of the amount of adjusted gross proceeds or tax liability originally reported on the tax return, any additional tax determined to be due may be assessed within six years after the due date of the tax return, or six years after the tax return was filed, whichever period expires later. An action may be brought although the person owing the fees or tax is not presently licensed.

Institute an action in any district court for declaratory or injunctive relief against a person, whether or not the person is a gaming licensee, as the attorney general deems necessary to prevent noncompliance with this chapter or gaming rules.

For good cause, require a licensed organization to use the attorney general’s recordkeeping system for any or all games.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 546, § 20; 1989, ch. 612, §§ 16, 17; 1993, ch. 499, § 28; 1995, ch. 484, § 28; 1997, ch. 428, § 19; 1999, ch. 441, § 13; 2001, ch. 460, § 12; 2003, ch. 449, § 11; 2005, ch. 466, § 1; 2017, ch. 360, § 9, effective August 1, 2017.

53-06.1-15.2.
Attorney general may bring civil action for collection of fees and tax and to force compliance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-15.3.
Exchange and secrecy of information regarding the internal revenue service. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-15.4.
Conditional license — Issuance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-16.
Violation of law or rule — Fraudulent scheme or technique to cheat or skim unlawful — Penalty.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, a person who knowingly makes a false statement on a request for record check form or in any application for a permit, or license, or in any accompanying statement, knowingly signs a false record or report, or who fails to maintain sufficient books and records or adequate internal control to substantiate gross proceeds, prizes, cash profits, expenses, or disbursement of net proceeds, or who falsifies any books or records, including any transaction involving the direct or indirect conduct of games, or who violates this chapter, any gaming rule, or of any term of a permit or license is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. If convicted, the person forfeits any gaming license or permit issued to it and is ineligible to reapply for a gaming license or permit for a period of time determined by the attorney general.

It is unlawful for a person:

To use bogus or counterfeit chips or pull tabs or to substitute or use any game, cards, pull tabs, or game piece that have been marked or tampered with.

To employ or have on one’s person any cheating device to facilitate cheating in any game, or to attempt to commit or commit a theft, or to assist in committing any other fraudulent scheme.

To willfully use any fraudulent scheme or technique, including when a person directly or indirectly solicits, provides, or receives inside information of the status of a game of pull tabs for the benefit of any person.

To alter or counterfeit a site authorization, license, or North Dakota gaming stamp.

To knowingly cause, aid, abet, or conspire with another person or to cause any person to violate this chapter or a gaming rule.

A person violating this subsection is guilty of a class A misdemeanor unless the total amount gained through the use of these items, schemes, or techniques resulted in a person obtaining over five hundred dollars, then the offense is a class C felony. However, if a person knowingly uses a fraudulent scheme regarding soliciting, providing, using, or receiving inside information involving the game of pull tabs or uses a fraudulent scheme or technique to cheat or skim involving pull tabs, twenty-one, paddlewheels, or bingo, regardless of the amount gained, the offense is a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 514, § 16; 1983, ch. 546, § 15; 1991, ch. 548, § 2; 1993, ch. 499, § 30; 1995, ch. 484, § 31; 1997, ch. 428, § 20; 1999, ch. 441, § 14; 2001, ch. 460, § 13; 2003, ch. 449, § 12.

53-06.1-16.1.
Bogus chips, marked cards, cheating devices, or fraudulent schemes unlawful — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-16.2.
License suspension or revocation — Ineligibility for local permit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-17.
Rules. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 428, § 21.

53-06.1-18.
Compulsive gambling prevention, awareness, crisis intervention, rehabilitation, and treatment services. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 460, § 14.